Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0796.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 and agencies to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,200,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,200,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 8,200,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,200,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,200,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 8,200,000 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Water infrastructure grants $ 8,200,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,200,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 8,200,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $8,200,000.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $8,200,000.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. Funds appropriated in part 1 must be allocated and expended in a manner consistent with federal rules and regulations. Sec. 204. Funds appropriated in part 1 are subject to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 applicable federal audit and reporting requirements. Prompt action shall be taken if instances of noncompliance are identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding. If any instance of noncompliance is identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding, the state budget director shall take necessary and immediate action to rectify it. The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies when an instance of noncompliance is identified. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for water infrastructure grants must be granted to municipalities for implementing a comprehensive PFAS management plan. (2) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for water infrastructure grants are designated as a work project appropriation. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide grant support to municipalities seeking to implement PFAS management plans. (b) The project will be accomplished by issuing grants to municipalities. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $8,200,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030.